Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 47. Party Organization

§ 2321.
Representative district committee.

The “representative district committee” of a party shall consist of those members of the town committee residing in a representative district. A representative district committee may encompass less than an entire town or may extend across town lines. Such a committee shall elect its own officers when called upon to meet, but it need not meet unless required to perform some function under this title. Any three members may call the first meeting by giving at least five days’ written notice to all other members; thereafter, the committee shall meet at the call of the chair.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 59

, § 8;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 2322.
Senatorial district committee.

The “senatorial district committee” of a party shall consist of those members of the county committee residing in a senatorial district. A senatorial district committee may encompass less than an entire county or may extend across county lines. Such a committee shall elect its own officers when called upon to meet, but it need not meet unless required to perform some function under this title. Any three members may call the first meeting by giving at least five days’ written notice to all other members; thereafter, the committee shall meet at the call of the chair.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 59

, § 9.

§ 2323.
Probate district committee.

The “probate district committee” of a party shall consist of those members of the county committee residing in a probate district. Such a committee shall elect its own officers when called upon to meet, but it need not meet unless required to perform some function under this title. The chair of the county committee may call the first meeting by giving at least five days’ written notice to all other members; thereafter the committee shall meet at the call of the probate district chair.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 21; amended

2003, No. 59

, § 10.